Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 14 Accounts of Executors and Administrators

33-14-1.
Times when accounts required.

Every executor and administrator, except as provided in §

33-17-3

, shall make out and return to the probate court, upon completion of the period of administration, and at such other times as shall be required by the court, pursuant to §

33-14-4

, an account relative to the estate in his or her hands, with a statement of the liquidated balance that may be due to or from him or her. Provided, however, that no interim accounting shall be required unless requested by an interested party, and any interim accounting may be excused by the probate court for good cause shown; and further provided, however, that every executor and administrator who is the sole beneficiary of the estate or who files a release from each beneficiary shall be permitted to file, in lieu of a final account, an affidavit of completed administration together with evidence that all Rhode Island estate and inheritance taxes for the estate have been satisfied, that the funeral bill has been paid, and that all claims filed against the estate have been satisfied.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 995; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-1

; P.L. 1973, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 99, § 1.

33-14-2.
Charges and credits shown — Investments.

Accounts rendered by an executor or administrator to the probate court shall be for a period stated therein, and shall charge the executor or administrator with the amount of the inventory, or, instead the amount of the balance of the last account rendered, as the case may be, and all income, all gains from the sale of personal property, and all other property received by him or her, although not inventoried, and all rents and proceeds of the sale of real estate received by the executor or administrator; the accounts shall credit all charges, losses and payments, including legacies, distribution, and specific personal property delivered, and shall also show the investments of the balance of the account, if any, and changes of investments, along with such documentation verifying such investments as the court may request.

An executor or administrator who is represented by an attorney shall not be required to submit originals or copies of evidence of charges, losses and payments which appear on his or her account, except for documentation required pursuant to the provisions of §

33-14-8

, but shall instead include with any such account a certification substantially in the form set forth in §

33-14-2.2

, signed by such executor or administrator and by said attorney. An executor or administrator who is not represented by an attorney or whose attorney declines to execute and submit such a certification shall, in addition to such certification, submit to the probate court for inspection copies of the front sides of all checks or other documents evidencing any such charges, losses and payments, unless specifically waived by the court.

Provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not prohibit the probate court, on its own motion, from ordering the executor or administrator to submit originals or copies of evidence of the charges, losses and payments which appear on the executor’s or administrator’s account, in any case where the court deems such documentation necessary to its review of such account.

As used in this section and in the remainder to title 33, the term “attorney” shall mean an individual who is a member in good standing of the Rhode Island Bar Association.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 996; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-2

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 7.

33-14-2.2.
Form of certification.

The certification referred to in §

33-14-2

shall be in substantially the following form:

CERTIFICATION OF ACCOUNTING The undersigned, (name of attorney), attorney, and (name of fiduciary), fiduciary hereby certify that the within accounting was prepared based on information which each of the undersigned have personally examined, and further certify that, to the best of the knowledge and belief of each of the undersigned, the within is a true and accurate representation of the accounts of the estate for the period indicated. (Name of fiduciary) Fiduciary (Name of attorney) Attorney STATE OF RHODE ISLAND COUNTY OF Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , 20. NOTARY PUBLIC My commission expires:

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 8.

33-14-3.
Examination of executor or administrator on oath.

An executor or administrator may be examined on oath before the court upon any matter relative to his or her accounts.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 997; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-3

.

33-14-4.
Citation to render account.

Every probate court on petition therefor, whenever it deems proper, may issue a citation to an executor or administrator, having accounts unsettled with the court, to render an account relative to the estate in his or her hands, at any time as it may order in the citation.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 998; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-4

.

33-14-5.
Failure to account after citation.

If an executor or administrator, after being cited, shall neglect or refuse to render an account within thirty (30) days after the time named in the citation, or such further time as the court may allow, he or she shall be held accountable for the full value of the personal property of the deceased, the proceeds of the sale of real estate, and the rents received by him or her, with interest, and shall be entitled to no compensation for his or her services.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 999; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-5

.

33-14-6.
Charges and disbursements allowed.

Executors and administrators shall be allowed in their accounts all reasonable and proper charges and disbursements made by them for the funeral of the deceased and in the execution of their trust.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1001; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-6

.

33-14-7.
Expense of prosecuting or defending appeal on admission to probate.

In case of an appeal from the order or decree of a probate court admitting or refusing to admit to probate the will of any deceased person, the court shall allow to the executor or administrator, as the case may be, his or her just and reasonable expenses, including counsel and attorney fees, in supporting or defending against the will, on appeal; and the expense shall be allowed in the account of the executor or administrator with the estate as part of the expenses of the settlement of the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 865; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 51; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 51; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 49; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-7

.

33-14-8.
Compensation of executors and administrators.

Executors and administrators shall, also, be allowed in their accounts such compensation for their services as the probate court shall consider just.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1002; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 8; P.L. 1930, ch. 1538, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-8

.

33-14-9.
Interest on unreasonable detention of money.

Executors and administrators may be charged in their accounts with interest, for the unreasonable detention of money, at a rate not more than twelve percent (12%) per annum.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1003; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-9

; P.L. 1983, ch. 204, § 1.

33-14-10.
Application of small amounts due to persons under disability.

Whenever it shall appear in the final account of an executor or administrator that the estate of a minor or person non compos mentis in his or her hands does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), the sum may be applied or disposed of in such manner as the probate court shall deem for the advantage of the minor or person non compos mentis.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1008; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-10

; P.L. 1960, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 204, § 1.

33-14-11.
Conclusiveness of settlement of accounts.

The settlement of the accounts of an executor or administrator by the probate court, or on appeal, shall be final and conclusive on all parties concerned; provided, that upon the settlement of an account, all former accounts of the same executor or administrator may be so far opened as to correct a mistake or error apparent in the settlement.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1004; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch 370, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-11

.

33-14-12.
Accounting between executors and administrators.

Whenever two (2) or more persons shall have letters testamentary or letters of administration granted to them, and any one or more of them shall refuse or neglect to apply the property in his, her, or their hands to the settlement of the estate, or to the payment of the debts or funeral charges of the testator or intestate, or shall refuse to account with the other executor or administrator, the aggrieved executor or administrator may bring his or her action against the others for an accounting.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 839; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-14-12

.

33-14-13.
Reopening of estates and administrations without court approval for assets totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less.

Subsequent to the filing of a final account of any estate or administration or an affidavit of completed administration pursuant to the provisions of §

33-14-1

, an estate or administration may be reopened by the executor or administrator without the consent of the probate court provided that the executor or administrator:

Files an affidavit with the court listing every newly discovered asset discovered by the executor or administrator along with its fair market value;

Provides notice to the persons who would take under the provisions of §

33-1-10

in the case of intestacy listing the asset(s) along with the fair market value;

Provides notice, if applicable, to those persons who would take under the provisions of the will listing the asset(s) along with the fair market value; and

Files a statement with the court and provides a copy to those persons described in subsections (a)(2) and (a)(3) setting forth the proposed distribution of the asset(s) or the funds received as a result of the sale of the asset(s).

If no objection is filed by said persons within thirty (30) days of the filing of the affidavit and statement, the executor or administrator may proceed to dispose of the asset(s) as indicated. If objection is filed, the probate court shall schedule a hearing on the objection within thirty (30) days of its receipt.

Upon completion of the distribution of the asset(s) per the statement or per any order of the probate court, the executor or administrator shall file an affidavit stating the names and the addresses of the persons receiving the asset(s), the value or amount received, and attesting that the estate or administration has now been finalized.

The procedure set forth in subsection (a) may only be used when the asset(s) subsequently discovered do not exceed the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate.

The executor or administrator shall be liable in his or her own wrong to all persons aggrieved by his or her actions taken in conformance with the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 385, § 1.